Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1347.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Tourism Improvement District Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Authority." A body politic and corporate created under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 56 (relating to municipal authorities)."Benefited business." A hotel as defined under section 12345678910111213141516171819 209(a)(1.4) of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, which is located within a tourism improvement district and benefits from tourism improvement district activities as outlined in the tourism improvement district plan."County." A county of any class located within this Commonwealth."Final plan." A final tourism improvement district plan."Nonprofit corporation." A legal entity that is incorporated in this Commonwealth and specifies in its charter or bylaws that no part of the net earnings may benefit a private shareholder or individual holding an interest in the entity."Preliminary plan." A preliminary tourism improvement district plan."Special assessment fee." A fee imposed on a benefited business and remitted to the county that establishes a tourism improvement district for the purposes of providing tourism activities."Substantial amendment." An amendment to a preliminary plan or an amendment to a final plan that does any of the following:(1) Removes or adds tourism activities provided in a tourism improvement district.(2) Increases expenditures in a tourism improvement district management association's budget by more than 25% for a single fiscal year.(3) Incurs additional indebtedness.(4) Changes the method for determining the amount of the special assessment fee.(5) Changes the tourism improvement district management association that administers tourism activities within the 20250HB1347PN1535 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 tourism improvement district.(6) Changes the tourism improvement district's geographic boundary.(7) Changes the characteristics of a benefited business. "Total room inventory." The number of rooms available for occupancy within a tourism improvement district."Tourism activity." An activity, service or improvement that provides a benefit to a benefited business, including any of the following:(1) Marketing, sales, event promotion and other promotional programs designed to increase tourism in a tourism improvement district.(2) Funding for special events designed to increase tourism in a tourism improvement district.(3) Destination product development activities designed to improve the visitor experience in a tourism improvement district.(4) Personnel and administrative support necessary to provide tourism activities.(5) Funding for the acquisition, construction, installation or maintenance of tangible property with an estimated useful life of no less than five years.(6) Any other activity, service or improvement that is designed to increase tourism in a tourism improvement district."Tourism improvement district" or "TID." A geographical area encompassing benefited businesses as proposed in a tourism improvement district plan and approved by a county ordinance."Tourism improvement district management association" or "TIDMA." The body that manages a tourism improvement district.20250HB1347PN1535 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Tourism improvement district plan." The strategic plan for tourism activities within a tourism improvement district.Section 3. Establishment of tourism improvement districts.(a) Establishment.--A benefited business may petition and present a preliminary plan to a county to establish a TID in the county.(b) Specific procedures.--(1) A county shall hold a public hearing for the purpose of receiving public comment on a preliminary plan. At least 30 days prior to the public hearing under this paragraph, the county shall provide all of the following to the extent reasonably practical to each benefited business located within the proposed TID via the United States Postal Service to the last known address on file with the county tax collection office:(i) A copy of the petition.(ii) A summary of the preliminary plan.(iii) Objection procedures.(iv) Amendment procedures.(v) The date, location and time of the public hearing.(2) A benefited business may file an objection to the preliminary plan in accordance with the following:(i) The objection shall be in writing and signed by the owner or authorized representative of the benefited business and identify the address of the benefited business for which the objection is being made.(ii) The benefited business shall file the objection with the chief clerk of the county no later than three days prior to a vote by the county adopting the 20250HB1347PN1535 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 preliminary plan.(3) If benefited businesses that make up 40% of the total room inventory within the proposed TID file objections under paragraph (2), the county may not vote to adopt the preliminary plan.(c) Contents of preliminary plan.--The preliminary plan shall include all of the following:(1) A map indicating the boundaries of the proposed TID.(2) A written report containing all of the following information regarding the proposed TID:(i) The name of the proposed TID.(ii) A detailed description of the geographic boundaries of the proposed TID.(iii) A list of proposed tourism activities and the estimated cost of the activities.(iv) The characteristics of a benefited business.(v) A budget for the first fiscal year of the proposed TID, including a budget for all of the following:(A) A reimbursement to the county for the mailing required under this act.(B) Tourism activities.(vi) A plan for the use of revenue generated from the proposed TID for the upcoming five fiscal years.(vii) The revenue sources for financing all proposed tourism activities.(viii) The estimated time for implementation and completion of all proposed tourism activities.(ix) A statement identifying the TIDMA that will administer the proposed TID.20250HB1347PN1535 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (x) The method for determining the amount of the special assessment fee to be imposed, which may be based on a percentage of gross rental revenue or a fixed rate per occupied room per night for each benefited business.(3) The respective duties of the county and TIDMA regarding the proposed TID, which shall include all of the following:(i) Maintaining the same level of programs and services provided within the county relating to tourism after the adoption of an ordinance establishing the proposed TID.(ii) Ensuring that the revenue generated from the proposed TID is used to supplement and not reduce existing funding for tourism in the county prior to the adoption of an ordinance establishing the proposed TID.(iii) Collecting the special assessment fee imposed on benefited businesses within the proposed TID.(d) Public hearings for substantial amendments.--The following shall apply to a substantial amendment to a preliminary plan:(1) Prior to a vote adopting the substantial amendment, a county shall hold at least one public hearing for the purpose of receiving public comment on the substantial amendment.(2) At least 30 days prior to a public hearing under paragraph (1), the county shall, to the extent reasonably practical, provide all of the following to each benefited business located within the proposed TID via the United States Postal Service to the last known address on file with the county tax collection office:20250HB1347PN1535 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) A copy of the preliminary plan.(ii) A summary of the substantial amendment.(iii) Objection procedures.(iv) Amendment procedures.(v) The date, location and time of the public hearing.(3) A benefited business may file an objection to the substantial amendment in accordance with the following:(i) The objection shall be in writing and signed by the owner or authorized representative of the benefited business and identify the address of the benefited business for which the objection is being made.(ii) The benefited business shall file the objection with the chief clerk of the county no later than three days prior to a vote by the county to adopt the substantial amendment.(4) If benefited businesses that make up 40% of the total room inventory within the proposed TID file objections under paragraph (3), the county may not vote to adopt the substantial amendment.(e) Final plan.--Prior to the establishment of a proposed TID, the county shall provide the final plan to the office of the chief clerk for the county. The county shall ensure that the final plan incorporates amendments made to the preliminary plan based on comments received from each benefited business provided at a public hearing or at any other time prior to approval of the final plan. No less than 30 days prior to the vote by the county establishing the proposed TID, the county shall make the final plan available on the county's publicly accessible Internet website.20250HB1347PN1535 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (f) Substantial amendments to final plan.--The following shall apply to substantial amendments to an approved final plan:(1) A substantial amendment to the final plan may only be submitted by the prospective TIDMA to the county upon the recommendation of a two-thirds majority of the governing board of the TIDMA.(2) A substantial amendment to the final plan shall only be adopted by a county after the submission of the substantial amendment by the prospective TIDMA. At least 30 days prior to the vote on the substantial amendment to the final plan, the county shall hold at least one public hearing for the purpose of receiving public comment on the substantial amendment to the final plan. The county shall, to the extent reasonably practical, provide all of the following to each benefited business located within the proposed TID via the United States Postal Service to the last known address on file with the county tax collection office:(i) A copy of the final plan.(ii) A summary of the substantial amendment.(iii) Objection procedures.(iv) Amendment procedures.(v) The date, location and time of a public hearing.(3) A benefited business may file an objection to the substantial amendment in accordance with the following:(i) The objection shall be in writing and signed by the owner or authorized representative of the benefited business and identify the address of the benefited business for which the objection is being made.(ii) The benefited business shall file the objection with the chief clerk of the county no later than three 20250HB1347PN1535 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 days prior to a vote by the county to adopt the substantial amendment.(4) Except as provided under paragraph (5), no later than 30 days from the date of a public hearing under paragraph (2), the county may vote on a substantial amendment to the final plan. If adopted, the substantial amendment to the final plan shall take effect upon the date of adoption unless otherwise specified in the final plan.(5) If benefited businesses that make up 40% of the total room inventory within the proposed TID file objections under paragraph (3), the county may not vote to adopt the substantial amendment.Section 4. Governance of tourism improvement districts.(a) Governance.--(1) A county may establish multiple TIDs within the boundaries of the county.(2) A county may establish a TID that only includes certain classifications of benefited businesses, including classification by total room inventory.(3) A county shall ensure that a benefited business is not included in more than one TID.(b) Special assessment fee.--(1) A county may impose a special assessment fee on a benefited business within the geographic boundaries of a TID for the purpose of providing tourism activities as specified in the final plan.(2) A benefited business shall collect the special assessment fee and remit the money generated from the fee to the county.(3) A benefited business may display the special 20250HB1347PN1535 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 assessment fee on each business transaction receipt.(4) A county may impose a fee on benefited business not to exceed 4% of the total special assessment fees collected by the benefited business in a fiscal year for the purpose of covering the costs incurred for administration of a TID.(5) A county shall deposit the money received from the special assessment fee, not including the money generated from the administrative fee imposed under paragraph (4), into a special fund established for such purpose.(c) Acquisitions.--A county may acquire, by gift, purchase or eminent domain, land, real property or rights-of-way that may be needed for the purposes of a TID in accordance with the final plan and Federal and State law.(d) Duration.--A county may establish a TID for an initial duration of five years, which shall be subject to renewal or termination by the county in accordance with this act.Section 5. Establishment of tourism improvement district management associations.(a) Establishment.--A county shall establish a TIDMA, including a governing board, to administer a TID by designating a newly created nonprofit corporation, an existing nonprofit corporation or an authority to administer tourism activities within the TID in accordance with the final plan. The TIDMA shall be incorporated as a nonprofit corporation in this Commonwealth or as an authority.(b) Administrative bodies.--A TIDMA shall have an administrative body. The following shall apply:(1) When a newly created nonprofit corporation is designated as the TIDMA, the certificate of incorporation or bylaws shall provide that the administrative body of the 20250HB1347PN1535 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 TIDMA be composed only of owners or authorized representatives of each benefited business. A representative of the county may have a position on the governing board of the TIDMA.(2) When an existing nonprofit corporation is designated as the TIDMA, the administrative body of the TIDMA shall be composed only of owners or authorized representatives of each benefited business. The owners or authorized representatives of each benefited business shall manage the money generated by the TID in accordance with the final plan. A representative of the county may have a position on the governing board of the TIDMA.(3) When an authority is designated as the TIDMA, the administrative body of the TIDMA shall be appointed under 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 56 (relating to municipal authorities). Notwithstanding 53 Pa.C.S. Ch. 56, the administrative body shall only be composed of owners or authorized representatives of each benefited business. A representative of the county may have a position on the governing board of the TIDMA.Section 6. Duties of tourism improvement district management associations.(a) Duties.--In accordance with a final plan, a TIDMA shall have the following duties:(1) Participate in a civil or administrative proceeding as a party.(2) Employ an executive director or administrator and any necessary supporting staff or contract for the provision of necessary supporting staff.(3) Prepare a planning or feasibility study or contract 20250HB1347PN1535 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 for the preparation of a planning or feasibility study to determine needed tourism activities or programs and services within a TID.(4) Make, conduct or facilitate tourism activities within a TID.(5) Purchase, own, construct, renovate, develop, operate, rehabilitate, manage, sell or dispose of real property.(6) Contract with an existing business, authority or other TIDMA within or outside of the TID.(7) Spend money allocated for a TID, including Federal, State or municipal funds received by the TIDMA in accordance with the final plan.(b) Special assessment fees.--(1) A TIDMA shall use the money generated from the special assessment fee to provide tourism activities within a TID in accordance with the final plan.(2) If the amount of money generated from the special assessment fee during a fiscal year exceeds the cost of the tourism activities within the TID for a fiscal year, not including administrative costs incurred by the county, the money shall be carried over and used for tourism activities within the TID in the next fiscal year.Section 7. Termination of tourism improvement districts.(a) Request for termination.--(1) Benefited businesses that make up 40% of the total room inventory within a TID may file a written request for the termination of the TID.(2) The benefited business shall file the request with the chief clerk for the county. Upon receipt of a request for 20250HB1347PN1535 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 termination, the county shall hold at least one public hearing for the purpose of receiving public comment before voting to terminate the TID. At least 30 days prior to the public hearing under this paragraph, the county shall, to the extent reasonably practical, provide all of the following to each benefited business located in the TID via the United States Postal Service to the last known address on file with the county tax collection office:(i) A copy of the written request for the termination of the TID.(ii) Objection procedures.(iii) Amendment procedures.(iv) The date, location and time of the public hearing.(3) A benefited business may file an objection to the written request in accordance with the following:(i) The objection shall be in writing and signed by the owner or authorized representative of the benefited business and identify the address of the benefited business for which the objection is being made.(ii) The benefited business shall file the objection with the chief clerk of the county no later than 10 days after the public hearing under paragraph (2).(4) If benefited businesses that make up 40% of the total room inventory within the TID do not object to the termination of the TID within 10 days after the public hearing under paragraph (2) and there is no outstanding and unpaid indebtedness incurred to accomplish a purpose of the TID, the county shall vote to terminate the TID. Ownership in assets of the TIDMA shall transfer to the county after the 20250HB1347PN1535 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 adoption of an ordinance terminating the TID.(b) Termination by county.--(1) A county may vote to terminate a TID that does not have outstanding and unpaid indebtedness incurred to accomplish a purpose of the TID if the county finds that there has been misappropriation of funds, malfeasance or a violation of Federal or State law in connection with the management of the TID.(2) Prior to the county voting to terminate a TID, the county shall hold at least one public hearing to determine by verification or reasonable certainty if there has been misappropriation of funds, malfeasance or a violation of Federal or State law in connection with the management of the TID.(3) At least 30 days prior to the public hearing under paragraph (2), the county shall, to the extent reasonably practical, provide all of the following to each benefited business located in the TID via the United States Postal Service to the last known address on file with the county tax collection office:(i) Objection procedures.(ii) Amendment procedures.(iii) The date, location and time of the public hearing.(4) A benefited business may file an objection to the proposed termination in accordance with the following:(i) The objection shall be in writing and signed by the owner or authorized representative of the benefited business and identify the address of the benefited business for which the objection is being made.20250HB1347PN1535 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The benefited business shall file the objection with the chief clerk of the county no later than 10 days after the public hearing under paragraph (2).(5) Ownership in assets of the TIDMA shall transfer to the county after the adoption of an ordinance terminating the TID.Section 8. Annual audit of tourism improvement district management associations.A TIDMA shall annually submit all of the following no later than 120 days after the end of each fiscal year:(1) An independent third-party audit of the income and expenditures and programmatic information to the chief clerk of the county.(2) A copy of the audit under paragraph (1) to each benefited business within a TID.Section 9. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1347PN1535 - 15 - 1234567891011121314151617